Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 57. Central Warehouse

§ 1501.
Power to obtain warehouse.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, with the approval of the Emergency Board, may arrange for and operate a general supply and material warehouse for the use of the State. In making this arrangement, he or she may enter into a lease with any person who may desire to construct and rent such a building to the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 156

, § 1; amended

1987, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. June 13, 1988;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 1502.
Division of cost.

The cost of leasing the warehouse may be prorated among the using departments and agencies.
The Commissioner of Finance and Management is directed to charge the pro rata share of this cost against the appropriation of each using agency.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 156

, § 2; amended

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

1987, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 1503.
Warehouse stocks, charges.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may stock the warehouse by purchase from time to time of supplies and materials in anticipation of the needs of State agencies. Costs shall be prorated according to those needs and charged to the accounts of using agencies. Payment shall be made from funds appropriated to the agencies for supplies.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 156

, § 3; amended

1987, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. June 13, 1988;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996.